Illinois, session 104th, SB2031.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5Marriage Act is amended by changing Section 602.7 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 5/602.7)7    Sec. 602.7. Allocation of parental responsibilities: 8parenting time.9    (a) Best interests. The court shall allocate parenting 10time according to the child's best interests. 11    (b) Allocation of parenting time. Unless the parents 12present a mutually agreed written parenting plan and that plan 13is approved by the court, the court shall allocate parenting 14time. It is presumed both parents are fit and the court shall 15not place any restrictions on parenting time as defined in 16Section 600 and described in Section 603.10, unless it finds 17by a preponderance of the evidence that a parent's exercise of 18parenting time would seriously endanger the child's physical, 19mental, moral, or emotional health.20    In determining the child's best interests for purposes of 21allocating parenting time, the court shall consider all 22relevant factors, including, without limitation, the 23following:  SB2031- 2 -LRB104 09778 JRC 19844 b1        (1) the wishes of each parent seeking parenting time;2        (2) the wishes of the child, taking into account the 3    child's maturity and ability to express reasoned and 4    independent preferences as to parenting time;5        (3) the amount of time each parent spent performing 6    caretaking functions with respect to the child in the 24 7    months preceding the filing of any petition for allocation 8    of parental responsibilities or, if the child is under 2 9    years of age, since the child's birth;10        (4) any prior agreement or course of conduct between 11    the parents relating to caretaking functions with respect 12    to the child;13        (5) the interaction and interrelationship of the child 14    with his or her parents and siblings and with any other 15    person who may significantly affect the child's best 16    interests;17        (6) the child's adjustment to his or her home, school, 18    and community;19        (7) the mental and physical health of all individuals 20    involved;21        (8) the child's needs;22        (9) the distance between the parents' residences, the 23    cost and difficulty of transporting the child, each 24    parent's and the child's daily schedules, and the ability 25    of the parents to cooperate in the arrangement;26        (10) whether a restriction on parenting time is   SB2031- 3 -LRB104 09778 JRC 19844 b1    appropriate;2        (11) the physical violence or threat of physical 3    violence by the child's parent directed against the child 4    or other member of the child's household;5        (12) the willingness and ability of each parent to 6    place the needs of the child ahead of his or her own needs;7        (13) the willingness and ability of each parent to 8    facilitate and encourage a close and continuing 9    relationship between the other parent and the child;10        (14) the occurrence of abuse against the child or 11    other member of the child's household; 12        (15) whether one of the parents is a convicted sex 13    offender or lives with a convicted sex offender and, if 14    so, the exact nature of the offense and what if any 15    treatment the offender has successfully participated in; 16    except that, if the conviction involved any minor who 17    lived in the offender's home, the court may not view 18    completion of a treatment program as evidence supporting 19    the child's physical, mental, moral, or emotional health; 20    the parties are entitled to a hearing on the issues raised 21    in this paragraph (15);22        (16) the terms of a parent's military family-care plan 23    that a parent must complete before deployment if a parent 24    is a member of the United States Armed Forces who is being 25    deployed; and 26        (17) any other factor that the court expressly finds   SB2031- 4 -LRB104 09778 JRC 19844 b1    to be relevant.2    (c) In allocating parenting time, the court shall not 3consider conduct of a parent that does not affect that 4parent's relationship to the child. 5    (d) Upon motion, the court may allow a parent who is 6deployed or who has orders to be deployed as a member of the 7United States Armed Forces to designate a person known to the 8child to exercise reasonable substitute visitation on behalf 9of the deployed parent, if the court determines that 10substitute visitation is in the best interests of the child. 11In determining whether substitute visitation is in the best 12interests of the child, the court shall consider all of the 13relevant factors listed in subsection (b) of this Section and 14apply those factors to the person designated as a substitute 15for the deployed parent for visitation purposes. Visitation 16orders entered under this subsection are subject to 17subsections (e) and (f) of Section 602.9 and subsections (c) 18and (d) of Section 603.10.19    (e) If the street address of a parent is not identified 20pursuant to Section 708 of this Act, the court shall require 21the parties to identify reasonable alternative arrangements 22for parenting time by the other parent including, but not 23limited to, parenting time of the minor child at the residence 24of another person or at a local public or private facility.25(Source: P.A. 99-90, eff. 1-1-16.)